Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 5. Computation of Compensation.

Collateral references. —

82 Am. Jur. 2d, Workers’ Compensation, §§ 379-445.

99 C.J.S., Workers’ Compensation, §§ 289-352.

Voluntary payment of compensation under statute of one state as bar to claim or ground for reduction of claim of compensation under statute of another state. 8 ALR2d 628.

Insured’s receipt of or right to workmen’s compensation benefits as affecting recovery under accident, hospital, or medical expense policy. 40 ALR3d 1012.

Sec. 23.30.172.
Benefit adjustments. [Repealed, § 11 ch 75 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 23.30.175.
Rates of compensation.

The weekly rate of compensation for disability or death may not exceed the maximum compensation rate, may not be less than 22 percent of the maximum compensation rate, and initially may not be less than $110. However, if the board determines that the employee’s spendable weekly wages are less than $110 a week as computed under AS

23.30.220

, or less than 22 percent of the maximum compensation rate a week in the case of an employee who has furnished documentary proof of the employee’s wages, it shall issue an order adjusting the weekly rate of compensation to a rate equal to the employee’s spendable weekly wages. If the employer can verify that the employee’s spendable weekly wages are less than 22 percent of the maximum compensation rate, the employer may adjust the weekly rate of compensation to a rate equal to the employee’s spendable weekly wages without an order of the board. If the employee’s spendable weekly wages are greater than 22 percent of the maximum compensation rate, but 80 percent of the employee’s spendable weekly wages is less than 22 percent of the maximum compensation rate, the employee’s weekly rate of compensation shall be 22 percent of the maximum compensation rate. Prior payments made in excess of the adjusted rate shall be deducted from the unpaid compensation in the manner the board determines. In any case, the employer shall pay timely compensation. In this subsection, “maximum compensation rate” means 120 percent of the average weekly wage, calculated under (d) of this section, applicable on the date of injury of the employee.

The following rules apply to benefits payable to recipients not residing in the state at the time compensation benefits are payable:

the weekly rate of compensation shall be calculated by multiplying the recipient’s weekly compensation rate calculated under AS

23.30.180

,

23.30.185

,

23.30.190

,

23.30.200

, or

23.30.215

by the ratio of the cost of living of the area in which the recipient resides to the cost of living in this state;

the calculation required by (1) of this subsection does not apply if the recipient is absent from the state for medical or rehabilitation services not reasonably available in the state;

if the gross weekly earnings of the recipient and the resulting compensation rate are determined under AS

23.30.220(a)(6)

, (7), or (10), the calculation required by this subsection applies only to the portion of the recipient’s weekly compensation rate attributable to wages earned in the state;

application of this subsection may not reduce the weekly compensation rate to less than $154 a week, except as provided in (a) of this section;

application of (1) — (4) of this subsection may not result in raising a recipient’s weekly compensation rate to an amount that exceeds the weekly compensation rate that the recipient would have received if the recipient had been residing in the state.

The department shall provide by regulation for the determination and comparison of living costs for this state and the other areas in which recipients reside and for the redetermination and comparison of these costs every three years.

By December 1 of each year, the commissioner shall determine the average weekly wage in this state by dividing the average annual wage in this state for the preceding calendar year by 52. The resulting figure is the average weekly wage in this state applicable for the period beginning January 1 and ending December 31 of the following calendar year. The average annual wage calculation required under this subsection shall include the wages of all employees in the state, both public and private, who are covered by this chapter.

If the commissioner fails to determine the average weekly wage in the state as required in (d) of this section until after January 1, but before April 1, of the year following the date the determination was to be made, an employer is not required to make a retroactive adjustment of compensation.

History.

(§ 5(2), (3) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 46 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 113 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 206 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 228 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 10 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 83 SLA 1975; am §§ 4, 5 ch 252 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 75 SLA 1977; am §§ 16 — 18, 27 ch 93 SLA 1982; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 70 SLA 1983; am § 30 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 75 SLA 1995; am §§ 15, 16 ch 105 SLA 2000; am §§ 53 — 55 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 78, ch. 10, FSSLA 2005, provides that (b)(5) of this section applies to an injury “occurring on or after September 1, 2005.”

Sec. 23.30.180.
Permanent total disability.

In case of total disability adjudged to be permanent 80 percent of the injured employee’s spendable weekly wages shall be paid to the employee during the continuance of the total disability. If a permanent partial disability award has been made before a permanent total disability determination, permanent total disability benefits must be reduced by the amount of the permanent partial disability award, adjusted for inflation, in a manner determined by the board. Loss of both hands, or both arms, or both feet, or both legs, or both eyes, or of any two of them, in the absence of conclusive proof to the contrary, constitutes permanent total disability. In all other cases permanent total disability is determined in accordance with the facts. In making this determination the market for the employee’s services shall be

area of residence;

area of last employment;

the state of residence; and

the State of Alaska.

Failure to achieve remunerative employability as defined in AS

23.30.041(r)

does not, by itself, constitute permanent total disability.

History.

(§ 7(1) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 83 SLA 1975; am § 5 ch 70 SLA 1983; am §§ 31, 32 ch 79 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In subsection (b), “AS

23.30.041(q)

” was substituted for “AS

23.30.041(p)

” in 1998, and “AS

23.30.041(r)

” was substituted for “AS

23.30.041(q)

” in 2000, to reflect the 1998 and 2000 reletterings of AS

23.30.041(r)

.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Sec. 23.30.185.
Compensation for temporary total disability.

In case of disability total in character but temporary in quality, 80 percent of the injured employee’s spendable weekly wages shall be paid to the employee during the continuance of the disability. Temporary total disability benefits may not be paid for any period of disability occurring after the date of medical stability.

History.

(§ 7(2) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 83 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 70 SLA 1983; am § 33 ch 79 SLA 1988)

Sec. 23.30.187.
Effect of unemployment benefits.

Compensation is not payable to an employee under AS

23.30.180

or

23.30.185

for a week in which the employee receives unemployment benefits.

History.

(§ 19 ch 93 SLA 1982)

Sec. 23.30.190.
Compensation for permanent partial impairment; rating guides.

In case of impairment partial in character but permanent in quality, and not resulting in permanent total disability, the compensation is $177,000 multiplied by the employee’s percentage of permanent impairment of the whole person. The percentage of permanent impairment of the whole person is the percentage of impairment to the particular body part, system, or function converted to the percentage of impairment to the whole person as provided under (b) of this section. The compensation is payable in a single lump sum, except as otherwise provided in AS

23.30.041

, but the compensation may not be discounted for any present value considerations.

All determinations of the existence and degree of permanent impairment shall be made strictly and solely under the whole person determination as set out in the American Medical Association Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment, except that an impairment rating may not be rounded to the next five percent. The board shall adopt a supplementary recognized schedule for injuries that cannot be rated by use of the American Medical Association Guides.

The impairment rating determined under (a) of this section shall be reduced by a permanent impairment that existed before the compensable injury. If the combination of a prior impairment rating and a rating under (a) of this section would result in the employee being considered permanently totally disabled, the prior rating does not negate a finding of permanent total disability.

When a new edition of the American Medical Association Guides described in (b) of this section is published, the board shall, not later than 90 days after the last day of the month in which the new edition is published, hold an open meeting under AS

44.62.310

to select the date on which the new edition will be used to make all determinations required under (b) of this section. The date selected by the board for using the new edition may not be later than 90 days after the last day of the month in which the new edition is published. After the meeting, the board shall issue a public notice announcing the date selected. The requirements of AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.300

do not apply to the selection or announcement of the date under this subsection.

History.

(§ 7(3) ch 193 SLA 1959; am §§ 5 — 10 ch 46 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 174 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 83 SLA 1975; am § 4 ch 75 SLA 1977; am § 7 ch 70 SLA 1983; am § 34 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1997; am § 17 ch 105 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

For self-insurance, see 8 AAC 46.

Sec. 23.30.191.
Expenses for rehabilitating injured employees. [Repealed, § 27 ch 93 SLA 1982.
For current law concerning rehabilitation of injured workers, see AS 23.30.041.]

Sec. 23.30.195.
Survival of the right to compensation.

Compensation to which any claimant would be entitled under AS

23.30.190

shall, notwithstanding death arising from causes other than the injury, be payable to and for the benefit of the persons following:

if there be a widow or widower and no child of the deceased, to the widow or widower;

if there be a widow or widower and a surviving child of the deceased, one-half to the widow or widower, the other half to the surviving child;

if there be a surviving child of the deceased, but no widow or widower, then to the child.

An award for disability may be made after the death of the injured employee.

History.

(§ 7 (4) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 33 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 87 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 27 ch 32 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Sec. 23.30.200.
Temporary partial disability.

In case of temporary partial disability resulting in decrease of earning capacity the compensation shall be 80 percent of the difference between the injured employee’s spendable weekly wages before the injury and the wage-earning capacity of the employee after the injury in the same or another employment, to be paid during the continuance of the disability, but not to be paid for more than five years. Temporary partial disability benefits may not be paid for a period of disability occurring after the date of medical stability.

The wage-earning capacity of an injured employee is determined by the actual spendable weekly wage of the employee if the actual spendable weekly wage fairly and reasonably represents the wage-earning capacity of the employee. The board may, in the interest of justice, fix the wage-earning capacity that is reasonable, having due regard to the nature of the injury, the degree of physical impairment, the usual employment, and other factors or circumstances in the case that may affect the capacity of the employee to earn wages in a disabled condition, including the effect of disability as it may naturally extend into the future.

History.

(§ 7(5) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 83 SLA 1975; am § 8 ch 70 SLA 1983; am §§ 35, 36 ch 79 SLA 1988)

Sec. 23.30.205.
Injury combined with preexisting impairment.

If an employee who has a permanent physical impairment from any cause or origin incurs a subsequent disability by injury arising out of and in the course of the employment resulting in compensation liability for disability that is substantially greater by reason of the combined effects of the preexisting impairment and subsequent injury or by reason of the aggravation of the preexisting impairment than that which would have resulted from the subsequent injury alone, the employer or the insurance carrier shall in the first instance pay all awards of compensation provided by this chapter, but the employer or the insurance carrier shall be reimbursed from the second injury fund for all compensation payments subsequent to those payable for the first 104 weeks of disability.

If the subsequent injury of the employee results in the death of the employee and it is determined that the death would not have occurred except for the preexisting permanent physical impairment, the employer or the insurance carrier shall in the first instance pay the compensation prescribed by this chapter, but the employer or the insurance carrier shall be reimbursed from the second injury fund for all compensation payable in excess of 104 weeks.

In order to qualify under this section for reimbursement from the second injury fund, the employer must establish by written records that the employer had knowledge of the permanent physical impairment before the subsequent injury and that the employee was retained in employment after the employer acquired that knowledge.

The second injury fund may not be bound as to any question of law or fact by reason of an award or an adjudication to which it was not a party or in relation to which the director was not notified at least three weeks before the award or adjudication that the fund might be subject to liability for the injury or death.

An employer or the employer’s carrier shall notify the commissioner of labor and workforce development of any possible claim against the second injury fund as soon as practicable, but in no event later than 100 weeks after the employer or the employer’s carrier has knowledge of the injury or death or after the deadline for submitting a claim for reimbursement under (f) of this section.

An employer or the employer’s insurance carrier shall satisfy all requirements for reimbursement under this section, including notice of any possible claim and payment of compensation in excess of 104 weeks, before submitting a claim for reimbursement to the second injury fund. Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, a claim for reimbursement may not be submitted for an injury or death that occurs after August 31, 2018, and must be submitted before October 1, 2020. An employer that qualifies for reimbursement under this section shall continue to receive reimbursement payments on claims accepted by the fund, or ordered by the board, until the fund’s liabilities for the claim are extinguished.

In this section, “permanent physical impairment” means any permanent condition, whether congenital or due to injury or disease, of such seriousness as to constitute a hindrance or obstacle to obtaining employment or to obtaining reemployment if the employee should become unemployed. A condition may not be considered a “permanent physical impairment” unless

it is one of the following conditions:

epilepsy,

diabetes,

cardiac disease,

arthritis,

amputated foot, leg, arm, or hand,

loss of sight of one or both eyes or a partial loss of uncorrected vision of more than 75 percent bilaterally,

residual disability from poliomyelitis,

cerebral palsy,

multiple sclerosis,

Parkinson’s disease,

cerebral vascular accident,

tuberculosis,

silicosis,

hemophilia,

chronic osteomyelitis,

osteoporosis,

ankylosis of joints,

hyperinsulinism,

muscular dystrophies,

arteriosclerosis,

thrombophlebitis,

varicose veins,

heavy metal poisoning,

ionizing radiation injury,

compressed air sequelae,

ruptured intervertebral disk,

spondylolisthesis; or

it would support a rating of disability of 200 weeks or more if evaluated according to standards applied in compensation claims.

History.

(§ 7(6) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 178 SLA 1968; am § 53 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 45 SLA 1997; am § 56 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 15, 16 ch 91 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1999, in (e) of this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2008, in (e) of this section, “has knowledge” was substituted for “have knowledge”.

In 2008 and 2018, subsection (g) was relettered to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes; in 2008, (d) and (e) were also relettered; and in 2018, subsection (f) was relettered after it was enacted as (g).

Cross references. —

For provision providing that the 2018 changes to this section “apply to notice of any possible claims or claims for reimbursement submitted on or after August 25, 2018”, see sec. 24(a), ch. 91, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 25, 2018, in (e), added “on or after the deadline for submitting a claim for reimbursement under (g) [now (f)] of this section” at the end; added (g) [now (f)].

Sec. 23.30.210.
Determination of wage-earning capacity. [Repealed, § 44 ch 79 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 23.30.215.
Compensation for death.

If the injury causes death, the compensation is known as a death benefit and is payable in the following amounts to or for the benefit of the following persons:

reasonable and necessary funeral expenses not exceeding $10,000;

if there is a widow or widower or a child or children of the deceased, the following percentages of the spendable weekly wages of the deceased:

80 percent for the widow or widower with no children;

50 percent for the widow or widower with one child and 40 percent for the child;

30 percent for the widow or widower with two or more children and 70 percent divided equally among the children;

100 percent for an only child when there is no widow or widower;

100 percent, divided equally, if there are two or more children and no widow or widower;

if the widow or widower remarries, the widow or widower is entitled to be paid in one sum an amount equal to the compensation to which the widow or widower would otherwise be entitled in the two years commencing on the date of remarriage as full and final settlement of all sums due the widow or widower;

if there is no widow or widower or child or children, then for the support of father, mother, grandchildren, brothers, and sisters, if dependent upon the deceased at the time of injury, 42 percent of the spendable weekly wage of the deceased to such beneficiaries, share and share alike, not to exceed $20,000 in the aggregate;

$5,000 to a surviving widow or widower, or equally divided among surviving children of the deceased if there is no widow or widower.

In computing death benefits, the spendable weekly wage of the deceased shall be computed under AS

23.30.220

and shall be paid in accordance with AS

23.30.155

and subject to the weekly maximum limitation in the aggregate as provided in AS

23.30.175

, but the total weekly compensation may not be less than $75 for a widow or widower nor less than $25 weekly to a child or $50 for children.

All questions of dependency shall be determined as of the time of the injury, or death.

Compensation under this chapter to aliens not residents, or about to become nonresidents, of the United States or Canada is the same in amount as provided for residents, except that dependents in a foreign country are limited to widow or widower and child or children, or if there is no widow or widower and child or children, to surviving father or mother whom the employee has supported, either wholly or in part, for a period of one year before the date of injury. The board, at its option, or upon the application of the insurance carrier, may commute all future installments of compensation to be paid to an alien dependent who is not a resident of the United States or Canada by paying or causing to be paid to the alien dependent one-half of the commuted amount of the future installments of compensation as determined by the board.

Death benefits payable to a widow or widower in accordance with (a) of this section shall abate as that person ceases to be entitled and does not inure to persons subject to continued entitlement. In the event a child ceases to be entitled, that child’s share shall inure to the benefit of the surviving spouse subject to adjustment as provided in (f) of this section.

Except as provided in (g) of this section, the death benefit payable to a widow or widower shall terminate 12 years following death of the deceased employee.

The provisions of (f) of this section do not apply to a widow or widower who at the time of death of the deceased worker is permanently and totally disabled. The death benefits payable to a widow or widower are not subject to reduction under (f) of this section after the widow or widower has attained the age of 52 years.

In the event a deceased worker is survived by children of a former marriage not living with the surviving widow or widower, then those children shall receive the amount being paid under a decree of child support; the difference between this amount and the maximum benefit payable under this section shall be distributed pro rata to the remainder of those entitled.

In the event the total amount of all benefits computed under (a)(2) of this section exceeds the maximum benefit provided in AS

23.30.175

, the maximum benefit under AS

23.30.175

shall be prorated among entitled survivors.

History.

(§ 8 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 99 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 1968; am § 34 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 1974; am §§ 88, 89 ch 127 SLA 1974; am §§ 7 — 12 ch 83 SLA 1975; am §§ 5 — 8 ch 75 SLA 1977; am §§ 10, 11 ch 70 SLA 1983; am § 8 ch 75 SLA 1995; am §§ 18, 19 ch 105 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 77 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 16, 2010, in (a)(1), substituted “$10,000” for “$5,000”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 3, ch. 77, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of (a)(1) of this section applies “to an injury occurring on or after June 16, 2010.”

Sec. 23.30.220.
Determination of spendable weekly wage.

Computation of compensation under this chapter shall be on the basis of an employee’s spendable weekly wage at the time of injury. An employee’s spendable weekly wage is the employee’s gross weekly earnings minus payroll tax deductions. An employee’s gross weekly earnings shall be calculated as follows:

if at the time of injury the employee’s earnings are calculated by the week, the weekly amount is the employee’s gross weekly earnings;

if at the time of injury the employee’s earnings are calculated by the month, the employee’s gross weekly earnings are the monthly earnings multiplied by 12 and divided by 52;

if at the time of injury the employee’s earnings are calculated by the year, the employee’s gross weekly earnings are the yearly earnings divided by 52;

if at the time of injury the employee’s earnings are calculated by the day, by the hour, or by the output of the employee, then the employee’s gross weekly earnings are 1/50 of the total wages that the employee earned from all occupations during either of the two calendar years immediately preceding the injury, whichever is most favorable to the employee;

if at the time of injury the employee’s earnings have not been fixed or cannot be ascertained, the employee’s earnings for the purpose of calculating compensation are the usual wage for similar services when the services are rendered by paid employees;

if at the time of injury the employee’s earnings are calculated by the week under (1) of this subsection or by the month under (2) of this subsection and the employment is exclusively seasonal or temporary, then the gross weekly earnings are 1/50 of the total wages that the employee has earned from all occupations during the 12 calendar months immediately preceding the injury;

when the employee is working under concurrent contracts with two or more employers, the employee’s earnings from all employers is considered as if earned from the employer liable for compensation;

if an employee when injured is a minor, an apprentice, or a trainee in a formalized training program, as determined by the board, whose wages under normal conditions would increase during the period of disability, the projected increase may be considered by the board in computing the gross weekly earnings of the employee; if the minor, apprentice, or trainee would have likely continued that training program, then the compensation shall be the average weekly wage at the time of injury rather than that based on the individual’s prior earnings;

if the employee is injured while performing duties as a volunteer ambulance attendant, volunteer police officer, or volunteer firefighter, then, notwithstanding (1) — (6) of this subsection, the gross weekly earnings for calculating compensation shall be the minimum gross weekly earnings paid a full-time ambulance attendant, police officer, or firefighter employed in the political subdivision where the injury occurred, or, if the political subdivision has no full-time ambulance attendants, police officers, or firefighters, at a reasonable figure previously set by the political subdivision to make this determination, but in no case may the gross weekly earnings for calculating compensation be less than the minimum wage computed on the basis of 40 hours work per week;

if an employee is entitled to compensation under AS

23.30.180

and the board determines that calculation of the employee’s gross weekly earnings under (1) — (7) of this subsection does not fairly reflect the employee’s earnings during the period of disability, the board shall determine gross weekly earnings by considering the nature of the employee’s work, work history, and resulting disability, but compensation calculated under this paragraph may not exceed the employee’s gross weekly earnings at the time of injury.

The commissioner shall annually prepare formulas that shall be used to calculate an employee’s spendable weekly wage on the basis of gross weekly earnings, number of dependents, marital status, and payroll tax deductions.

In this section,

“seasonal work” means employment that is not intended to continue through an entire calendar year, but recurs on an annual basis;

“temporary work” means employment that is not permanent, ends upon completion of the task, job, or contract, and ends within six months from the date of injury.

History.

(§ 9 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 13 ch 70 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 1968; am §§ 10, 11 ch 75 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 77 SLA 1979; am § 12 ch 70 SLA 1983; am § 37 ch 79 SLA 1988; am §§ 9, 10 ch 75 SLA 1995; am § 20 ch 105 SLA 2000; am § 57 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, the terms “police officer” and “fire fighter” were substituted for “policeman” and “fireman” in this section under §§ 59 and 60, ch. 50, SLA 1989.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Sec. 23.30.224.
Coordination of benefits.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, an employer’s liability for payment of weekly compensation under AS

23.30.180

or

23.30.185

to an employee eligible for a disability benefit under AS

14.25.130

, AS

39.35.400

, or

39.35.410

may not exceed the lesser of

the difference between the disability benefit payable to the employee under AS

14.25.130

, AS

39.35.400

, or

39.35.410

, converted to a weekly basis, and 100 percent of the employee’s spendable weekly wage as calculated under AS

23.30.220

; or

the maximum compensation rate calculated under AS

23.30.175

.

An employer’s liability for payment of compensation under AS

23.30.041(k)

to an employee eligible for a disability benefit payable under AS

14.25.130

, AS

39.35.400

, or

39.35.410

may not exceed the lesser of

the difference between the disability benefit payable to the employee under AS

14.25.130

, AS

39.35.400

, or

39.35.410

, converted to a weekly basis, and 80 percent of the employee’s spendable weekly wage as calculated under AS

23.30.220

; or

105 percent of the average weekly wage calculated under AS

23.30.175(d)

.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the liability of an employer for payment of compensation for an injury or illness under AS

23.30.180

or

23.30.185

to an employee who is covered by a union or group retirement system to which the employer makes contributions under a collective bargaining agreement or by membership in a welfare or pension plan or trust may not exceed the lesser of

the difference between 100 percent of the employee’s spendable weekly wage and an amount equal to the disability benefit, disability pension, or medical retirement benefit that the employee is eligible to receive as a result of the injury or illness, as calculated on a weekly basis, under the retirement system or welfare or pension plan or trust; or

the maximum compensation rate calculated under AS

23.30.175

.

If the union or group retirement system, pension plan, or trust referred to in (c) of this section provides by its terms that its benefits are precluded or reduced if benefits are awarded under this chapter, the limitation provided in (c)(1) of this section is not applicable to the extent of the amount precluded or reduced.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the liability of an employer for payment of compensation for an injury or illness under AS

23.30.041(k)

to an employee who is covered by a union or group retirement system to which the employer makes contributions under a collective bargaining agreement or by membership in a welfare or pension plan or trust may not exceed the lesser of

the difference between 100 percent of the employee’s spendable weekly wage and an amount equal to the disability benefit, disability pension, or medical retirement benefit that the employee is eligible to receive as a result of the injury or illness, calculated on a weekly basis, under the retirement system or welfare or pension plan or trust; or

105 percent of the average weekly wage calculated under AS

23.30.175(d)

.

If the union or group retirement system, pension plan, or trust referred to in (e) of this section provides by its terms that its benefits are precluded or reduced if benefits are awarded under this chapter, the limitation provided in (e)(1) of this section is not applicable to the extent of the amount precluded or reduced.

If the employee receives a lump sum distribution of disability benefits, disability pension, or medical retirement benefits, the combined workers’ compensation and weekly disability or medical retirement benefit specified in this section shall be calculated by assuming that the employee received weekly disability or medical retirement payments under the applicable plan from the date of eligibility for the disability benefit or medical retirement until the total of the weekly payments equals the amount of the lump sum, exclusive of that portion of the lump sum specifically set aside under the applicable plan for retraining expenses, medical and transportation expenses, and attorney fees or other legal costs.

History.

(§ 58 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 23.30.225.
Social security and pension or profit sharing plan offsets.

When periodic retirement or survivors’ benefits are payable under 42 U.S.C. 401 — 433 (Title II, Social Security Act), the weekly compensation provided for in this chapter shall be reduced by an amount equal as nearly as practicable to one-half of the federal periodic benefits for a given week.

When it is determined that, in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 401 — 433, periodic disability benefits are payable to an employee or the employee’s dependents for an injury for which a claim has been filed under this chapter, weekly disability benefits payable under this chapter shall be offset by an amount by which the sum of (1) weekly benefits to which the employee is entitled under 42 U.S.C. 401 — 433, and (2) weekly disability benefits to which the employee would otherwise be entitled under this chapter, exceeds 80 percent of the employee’s average weekly wages at the time of injury.

If employer contributions to a qualified pension or profit sharing plan have been included in the determination of gross earnings and the employee is receiving pension or profit sharing payments, weekly compensation benefits payable under this chapter shall be reduced by the amount paid or payable to the injured worker under the plan for any week or weeks during which compensation benefits are also payable. The amount of the reduction may not in any week exceed the increase in weekly compensation benefits brought about by the inclusion of employer contributions to a qualified pension or profit sharing plan in the determination of gross earnings.

History.

(§ 9 ch 75 SLA 1977; am § 38 ch 79 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.